Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 9. General Provisions.

Sec. 16.43.940.
Exempted activities.

This chapter does not apply to activities authorized by a permit issued under AS

16.40.100

or

16.40.120

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 145 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 16.43.140(d).
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 16.43.945.
Commercial fishing privileges exempt from claims of creditors.

Except as provided in AS

16.10.333

—

16.10.338

, AS

16.43.170(g)

, AS

44.81.215

, and

44.81.231

—

44.81.250

, commercial fishing privileges granted under this chapter, including entry permits, are exempt from claims of creditors, including claims under AS

09.38.065

and AS

45.29.408

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 138 SLA 2002)

Sec. 16.43.950.
Applications of regulations of Board of Fisheries.

Nothing in this chapter limits the powers of the Board of Fisheries, including the power to determine legal types of gear and the power to establish size limitations or other uniform restrictions applying to a certain type of gear. Holders of interim-use permits or entry permits issued under this chapter are subject to all regulations adopted by the Board of Fisheries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 31 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.43.350

. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

Sec. 16.43.955.
Hearings in proximity to Board of Fisheries meetings.

When practicable, a commission hearing that deals with the subject of limiting entry to a fishery shall be held on the same dates on which, and in the same building or in a building adjacent to the building in which, a Board of Fisheries meeting is being held.

History.

(§ 7 ch 22 SLA 1985)

Sec. 16.43.960.
Commission revocation or suspension of permits.

The commission may revoke, suspend, or transfer all entry or interim-use permits held by a person who knowingly provides or assists in providing false information, or fails to correct false information provided to the commission for the purpose of obtaining a benefit for self or another, including the issuance, renewal, duplication, or transfer of an entry or interim-use permit, or vessel license. The commission may suspend that person’s eligibility to hold an entry or interim-use permit for a period not to exceed three years, and may impose an administrative fine of not more than $5,000 on the person. The commission may also impose an administrative fine of not more than $5,000 on an entity whose officers, employees, representatives, or agents knowingly provide or assist in providing false information, or fail to correct false information provided, to the commission for the purpose of obtaining a benefit.

The commission shall serve the respondent personally or by certified or registered mail with a notice to show cause why the proposed action should not take place. The notice to show cause must

be supported by an affidavit, which may be made on information or belief, setting out the facts that are the basis of the proposed actions;

provide for a least 30 days’ notice of the place, date, and time of the hearing where the respondent may present evidence in opposition to the proposed action; unless waived in writing by the respondent, the hearing shall be held within the judicial district in which the respondent resides if the respondent resides in the state; the hearing place shall be at the discretion of the commission for those respondents residing outside the state;

specify the statutes or regulations violated;

state with particularity the action proposed to be taken;

indicate to the respondent that the respondent’s ability to permanently transfer the permits that are the subject of the show cause proceedings has been suspended as of the date of the notice and will continue to be suspended until the exhaustion of all administrative and judicial remedies; and

provide other information the commission considers proper.

A permit subject to show cause proceedings under this section may not be transferred after the date of the notice in (b) of this section pending exhaustion of all administrative and judicial remedies arising from action taken under this section.

Except when there is a vacancy as provided in AS

16.43.030(c)

, the show cause hearing shall be conducted before a quorum of commissioners and shall be presided over by a hearing officer appointed by the commission who shall rule on the presentation of evidence and other procedural matters. Hearings shall be conducted in accordance with regulations adopted under AS

16.43.110(b)

.

The failure of a respondent properly served under (b) of this section to appear at the hearing is not grounds for setting aside any commission action taken. However, the commission may in its discretion order a continuance or second hearing.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 22 SLA 1985.]

The provisions of this section apply to conduct occurring after January 1, 1973, but do not affect a permit held by a person who is a bona fide purchaser. Failure to correct false information is a continuing offense.

Judicial review of commission determinations under this section is in accordance with AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

; however, if a hearing de novo is granted under AS

44.62.570(d)

, the hearing may, in the discretion of the court, be had with a jury sitting if application for the jury hearing is filed with the court no later than 10 days after service of the notice of appeal.

An entry permit revoked by the commission under this section that is pledged as security for a loan under AS

16.10.333

or AS

44.81.231

shall be reassigned or sold as provided in AS

16.10.337

or AS

44.81.250

.

The commission shall immediately cancel a limited entry permit card issued to a debtor under a loan made under AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

when the commission receives a certificate of loan termination containing a copy of the

notice required by AS

16.10.335(a)

; or

notice that, if the debtor has filed bankruptcy, the automatic stay issued is no longer in effect and the debtor has not reaffirmed the debt.

History.

(§ 6 ch 123 SLA 1978; am §§ 8, 9 ch 47 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 22 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 84 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 34 SLA 1996; am §§ 9, 10 ch 137 SLA 2002; am §§ 5, 6 ch 2 SLA 2014; am § 14 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

16.43.355

. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

For administrative hearings and adjudications, see 20 AAC 5, art. 18.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in (d), added “Except when there is a vacancy as provided in AS

16.43.030(c)

,” at the beginning, and made a related change.

Sec. 16.43.970.
Penalties.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter is, upon conviction, guilty of a class B misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000 for a first conviction, and a fine of not more than $10,000 for a second or third conviction. Upon a first or second conviction under this subsection, the court may in its discretion also order the commission to suspend the commercial fishing privileges of the person for a period of not more than three years and to revoke one or more or all commercial fishing permits held by the person. Upon a third or subsequent conviction under this subsection, the person is also subject to a loss of commercial fishing privileges as provided under (i) of this section. This subsection does not apply to violations of AS

16.43.140(a)

.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement to the commission for the purpose of obtaining a benefit, including the issuance, renewal, duplication, or transfer of an entry or interim-use permit or vessel license or a person who assists another by knowingly making a false statement to the commission for the purpose of obtaining a benefit for another, is guilty of the crime of unsworn falsification in the second degree as set out in AS

11.56.210

. Upon conviction, the person is also subject to suspension of commercial fishing privileges and revocation of commercial fishing permits under (i) of this section.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 47 SLA 1981.]

If a permit holder is charged by the state with violating a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, the holder may not transfer any interim-use or entry permit under AS

16.43.170

until after the final adjudication or dismissal of the charges.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an interim-use or entry permit may not be transferred while under suspension, without the consent of the commission.

A commercial fishing entry permit revoked under this section that is pledged as security for a loan under AS

16.10.333

, or

16.10.338

, or AS

44.81.231

shall be reassigned as provided in AS

16.10.337

or AS

44.81.250

.

A person who violates the provisions of AS

16.43.140(a)

is

upon a first conviction, guilty of a class B misdemeanor and may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 90 days, or forfeiture of the person’s fishing vessel, or both, and shall be sentenced to a fine of not less than $5,000 nor more than $10,000 and loss of commercial fishing privileges under (i) of this section;

upon a second conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor and may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than one year, and shall be sentenced to a fine of not less than $10,000 nor more than $20,000, forfeiture of the person’s fishing vessel, and loss of commercial fishing privileges under (i) of this section;

upon a third or subsequent conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor and may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than one year, and shall be sentenced to a fine of not less than $20,000 nor more than $50,000, forfeiture of the person’s fishing vessel, and loss of commercial fishing privileges under (i) of this section.

A person convicted of violating the provisions of AS

16.43.140(a)

forfeits the value of the fishery resources found on board the person’s vessel at the time of the violation.

Upon the conviction of a person for an offense described under (a), (b), or (g) of this section, the court shall immediately notify the commission of the conviction. The notice provided by the court shall be accompanied by an order suspending commercial fishing privileges and revoking commercial fishing permits under (a) of this section, as appropriate. The commission shall, upon receipt of

an order from the court under (a) of this section, suspend the commercial fishing privileges of a person for the period set by the court and revoke commercial fishing permits held by the person as directed by the court;

a notice from the court that a person has been convicted of a third or subsequent violation of (a) of this section, suspend all commercial fishing privileges of the person for a period of three years from the date of conviction and revoke all commercial fishing permits held by the person;

a notice from the court that a person has been convicted of a violation described under (b) of this section, suspend all commercial fishing privileges of the person for a period of three years from the date of conviction and revoke all commercial fishing permits held by the person;

a notice from the court that a person has been convicted of a violation described under (g)(1) of this section, suspend all commercial fishing privileges of the person for a period of one year from the date of conviction;

a notice from the court that a person has been convicted of a violation described under (g)(2) of this section, suspend all commercial fishing privileges of the person for a period of two years from the date of conviction;

a notice from the court that a person has been convicted of a violation described under (g)(3) of this section, suspend all commercial fishing privileges of the person for a period of five years from the date of conviction.

In this section,

“commercial fishing permit” means an entry permit or an interim-use permit issued under this chapter;

“commercial fishing privileges” means the privilege of participating in an activity for which a commercial fishing permit is required and the privilege of obtaining a commercial fishing permit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 7 ch 73 SLA 1977; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 123 SLA 1978; am §§ 10, 12 ch 47 SLA 1981; am §§ 4, 5 ch 94 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 22 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 34 SLA 1996; am §§ 5 — 9 ch 110 SLA 1998; am §§ 11 — 23 ch 137 SLA 2002; am § 14 ch 42 SLA 2006; am §§ 7 — 18, 25 ch 2 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.360. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors generally, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 16.43.975.
Public disclosure of certain documents prohibited.

Documents submitted to the commission containing information relating to an individual’s personal finances and information supplied by individuals for research purposes, produced in response to requests by the commission, are not subject to public disclosure.

History.

(§ 10 ch 22 SLA 1985)

Sec. 16.43.980.
Report and recommendations.

The commission shall prepare an annual report and notify the legislature that it is available. The report must include but not be limited to the following:

a progress report on the reduction of entry permits to optimum levels;

recommendations for additional legislation relating to the regulation of entry of participants and vessels into Alaska commercial fisheries.

[Repealed, § 37 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 37 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 23 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 24 ch 137 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.43.370

. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 16.43.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commission” means the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission;

“economically healthy fishery” means a fishery that yields a sufficient rate of economic return to the fishermen participating in it to provide for, among other things, the following:

maintenance of vessels and gear in satisfactory and safe operating condition; and

ability and opportunity to improve vessels, gear and fishing techniques, including, when permissible, experimentation with new vessels, new gear, and new techniques;

“entity” means a corporation, company, partnership, firm, association, organization, joint venture, trust, society, or other legal entity other than a natural person;

“fishery” means the commercial taking of a specific fishery resource in a specific administrative area with a specific type of gear; however, the commission may designate a fishery to include more than one specific administrative area, gear type, or fishery resource;

“gear” means the specific apparatus used in the commercial harvest of a species, including but not limited to purse seines, drift gill nets, set gill nets, and troll gear;

“optimum number” includes an optimum range of numbers;

“person” means a natural person; “person” does not include a corporation, company, partnership, firm, association, organization, joint venture, trust, society, or other legal entity other than a natural person;

“present ability to actively participate” means the person applying for a permit is physically able to harvest fish in the fishery and has reasonable access to commercial fishing gear of the type utilized in that fishery;

“priority classification” means the allocation of potential permit applicants into reasonable groupings of similarly situated applicants and the priority ranking of those groupings according to the extent to which they satisfy the standards of preference;

“type of gear” means a customary and identifiable classification of gear and shall include:

those classifications for which separate regulations were adopted by the Board of Fisheries and for which separate gear licenses were required by former AS 16.05.550 —

16.05.630

; and

distinct subclassifications of gear such as “power” troll gear and “hand” troll gear;

“unit of gear” means the maximum amount of a specific type of gear that can be fished by a person under regulations established by the Board of Fisheries defining the legal requirements for that type of gear.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am §§ 32, 33 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 47 SLA 1981; am § 70 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 135 SLA 2002; am §§ 25, 26 ch 137 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.43.380

. Renumbered in 1983.

Paragraphs (3) and (6) were enacted as (10); renumbered in 2002, at which time paragraphs (3) and (4) were renumbered as (4) and (5) and paragraphs (6) - (9) were renumbered as (8) - (11).

Administrative Code. —

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

For optimum numbers of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 11.